Hawaii, session 2026, HB843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in the past twenty years, the college of tropical agriculture and human resilience (CTAHR) at the university of Hawaii at Manoa has lost personnel and struggled with deteriorating facilities and infrastructure.  Without proper staffing, CTAHR will be unable to support its agricultural research and extension stations, which serve as hubs for region-specific agricultural research, education, and community engagement and support local farmers and ranchers.  The legislature further finds that many of CTAHR's facilities are decades old, with some dating back to the early- to mid-1900s, and most facilities have only received minimal repairs over the years. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Appropriate funds for critical repairs, maintenance, demolition, design, and construction for facilities of the college of tropical agriculture and human resilience at the university of Hawaii at Manoa; and (2)  Establish positions within the university of Hawaii for the college of tropical agriculture and human resilience at the university of Hawaii at Manoa. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $11,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for critical repairs, maintenance, demolition, design, and construction for facilities of the college of tropical agriculture and human resilience at the university of Hawaii at Manoa; provided that the sums appropriated shall be expended as follows: (1)  $5,000,000 for the Waimanalo research station on Oahu; and (2)  $6,000,000 for the Magoon research station on Oahu. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,083,334 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish eight full-time equivalent (8.0 FTE) agricultural technician positions, four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) community coordinator positions, and eight full-time equivalent (8.0 FTE) administrative professional technical positions within the university of Hawaii for the college of tropical agriculture and human resilience. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________